Utah statutes.
78A-2-501.   Online court assistance program -- Purpose of program -- User's
fee.
(1)  There is established an online court assistance program administered by
the Administrative Office of the Courts to provide the public with information
about civil procedures and to assist the public in preparing and filing civil
pleadings and other papers in:
(a)  uncontested divorces;
(b)  enforcement of orders in the divorce decree;
(c)  landlord and tenant actions; and
(d)  other types of proceedings approved by the Online Court Assistance
Program Policy Board.
(2)  The purpose of the online court assistance program shall be to:
(a)  minimize the costs of civil litigation;
(b)  improve access to the courts; and
(c)  provide for informed use of the courts and the law by pro se litigants.
(3) (a)  An additional $20 shall be added to the filing fee established by
Section 78A-2-301 if a person files a complaint, petition, answer, or response
prepared through the program.  There shall be no fee for using the program or
for papers filed subsequent to the initial pleading.
(b)  There is created within the General Fund a restricted account known as
the Online Court Assistance Account.  The fee collected under this Subsection
(3) shall be deposited in the restricted account and appropriated by the
Legislature to the Administrative Office of the Courts to develop, operate,
and maintain the program and to support the use of the program through
education of the public.
